utilities/dictionaries/fo_FO-Faroese.aff
FLAG num
#áraskrambul
SFX 505 N 11
SFX 505 0 la .
SFX 505 0 lanna .
SFX 505 0 li .
SFX 505 0 lið .
SFX 505 0 lini .
SFX 505 0 linum .
SFX 505 0 lum .
SFX 505 0 lunum .
SFX 505 0 ul .
SFX 505 0 uls .
SFX 505 0 ulsins .

#akvavitt
SFX 506 N 5
SFX 506 t s .
SFX 506 t sins .
SFX 506 0 i .
SFX 506 0 ið .
SFX 506 0 inum .

#býur
SFX 507 N 14
SFX 507 0 a .
SFX 507 0 anna .
SFX 507 0 ar .
SFX 507 0 arins .
SFX 507 0 i .
SFX 507 0 in .
SFX 507 0 ir .
SFX 507 0 irnar .
SFX 507 0 irnir .
SFX 507 0 num .
SFX 507 0 um .
SFX 507 0 unum .
SFX 507 0 ur .
SFX 507 0 urin .

#alfagur
SFX 508 N 7
SFX 508 0 ra .
SFX 508 0 ran .
SFX 508 0 rar .
SFX 508 0 rari .
SFX 508 0 rir .
SFX 508 0 ur .
SFX 508 0 urt .

#bakkahvonn
SFX 509 N 6
SFX 509 0 a .
SFX 509 0 anna .
SFX 509 0 ar .
SFX 509 0 arinnar .
SFX 509 0 ir .
SFX 509 0 irnar .

#barsil
SFX 510 N 6
SFX 510 0 il .
SFX 510 0 ilin .
SFX 510 0 ils .
SFX 510 0 ilsins .
SFX 510 0 li .
SFX 510 0 linum .

#alifjørður
SFX 511 N 7
SFX 511 0 i .
SFX 511 0 inum .
SFX 511 0 ir .
SFX 511 0 irnar .
SFX 511 0 irnir .
SFX 511 0 um .
SFX 511 0 unum .

#blásteinsløgur
SFX 512 N 2
SFX 512 0 ar .
SFX 512 0 arins .

#áfall
SFX 513 N 7
SFX 513 l s .
SFX 513 l sins .
SFX 513 0 a .
SFX 513 0 anna .
SFX 513 0 i .
SFX 513 0 ið .
SFX 513 0 inum .

#alfagur
SFX 514 N 2
SFX 514 0 rum .
SFX 514 0 ur .

#bóndi
SFX 515 N 3
SFX 515 0 ur .
SFX 515 0 urnar .
SFX 515 0 urnir .

#bóndi
SFX 516 N 9
SFX 516 0 a .
SFX 516 0 an .
SFX 516 0 anna .
SFX 516 0 ans .
SFX 516 0 anum .
SFX 516 0 i .
SFX 516 0 in .
SFX 516 0 um .
SFX 516 0 unum .

#aldagamal
SFX 517 N 7
SFX 517 0 al .
SFX 517 0 alt .
SFX 517 0 la .
SFX 517 0 lan .
SFX 517 0 lar .
SFX 517 0 lari .
SFX 517 0 lir .

#bakspónur
SFX 518 N 5
SFX 518 0 ir .
SFX 518 0 irnar .
SFX 518 0 irnir .
SFX 518 0 um .
SFX 518 0 unum .

#borðskikkur
SFX 519 N 14
SFX 519 k s .
SFX 519 k sins .
SFX 519 0 a .
SFX 519 0 anna .
SFX 519 0 i .
SFX 519 0 in .
SFX 519 0 inum .
SFX 519 0 ir .
SFX 519 0 irnar .
SFX 519 0 irnir .
SFX 519 0 um .
SFX 519 0 unum .
SFX 519 0 ur .
SFX 519 0 urin .

#bótaroffur
SFX 520 N 11
SFX 520 f ra .
SFX 520 f ranna .
SFX 520 f ri .
SFX 520 f rið .
SFX 520 f rini .
SFX 520 f rinum .
SFX 520 f rum .
SFX 520 f runum .
SFX 520 0 ur .
SFX 520 0 urs .
SFX 520 0 ursins .

#aldagamal
SFX 521 N 2
SFX 521 0 lum .
SFX 521 0 ul .

#alifjørður
SFX 522 N 5
SFX 522 0 in .
SFX 522 0 um .
SFX 522 0 unum .
SFX 522 0 ur .
SFX 522 0 urin .

#estlendskur
SFX 523 N 9
SFX 523 0 lendsk .
SFX 523 0 lendska .
SFX 523 0 lendskan .
SFX 523 0 lendskar .
SFX 523 0 lendskari .
SFX 523 0 lendskir .
SFX 523 0 lendskt .
SFX 523 0 lendskum .
SFX 523 0 lendskur .

#avstokkin
SFX 524 N 8
SFX 524 k na .
SFX 524 k nan .
SFX 524 k nar .
SFX 524 k nari .
SFX 524 k nir .
SFX 524 k num .
SFX 524 0 ið .
SFX 524 0 in .

#albann
SFX 525 N 5
SFX 525 n s .
SFX 525 n sins .
SFX 525 0 i .
SFX 525 0 ið .
SFX 525 0 inum .

#alfrøði
SFX 526 N 7
SFX 526 0 i .
SFX 526 0 in .
SFX 526 0 ina .
SFX 526 0 ini .
SFX 526 0 innar .
SFX 526 0 ir .
SFX 526 0 irnar .

#belgja
SFX 527 N 6
SFX 527 d di .
SFX 527 d du .
SFX 527 d ir .
SFX 527 d ja .
SFX 527 d t .
SFX 527 0 ur .

#armsveiggj
SFX 528 N 11
SFX 528 gj s .
SFX 528 gj sins .
SFX 528 j i .
SFX 528 j ið .
SFX 528 j ini .
SFX 528 j inum .
SFX 528 0 a .
SFX 528 0 anna .
SFX 528 0 num .
SFX 528 0 um .
SFX 528 0 unum .

#gánus
SFX 529 N 11
SFX 529 0 a .
SFX 529 0 anna .
SFX 529 0 ar .
SFX 529 0 arnar .
SFX 529 0 arnir .
SFX 529 0 i .
SFX 529 0 in .
SFX 529 0 ins .
SFX 529 0 inum .
SFX 529 0 um .
SFX 529 0 unum .

#almannafæ
SFX 530 N 2
SFX 530 0 ar .
SFX 530 0 arsins .

#almannafæ
SFX 531 N 3
SFX 531 0 i .
SFX 531 0 ið .
SFX 531 0 num .

#bakspónur
SFX 532 N 13
SFX 532 0 a .
SFX 532 0 anna .
SFX 532 0 ar .
SFX 532 0 arins .
SFX 532 0 arnar .
SFX 532 0 arnir .
SFX 532 0 i .
SFX 532 0 in .
SFX 532 0 inum .
SFX 532 0 um .
SFX 532 0 unum .
SFX 532 0 ur .
SFX 532 0 urin .

#bálharður
SFX 533 N 7
SFX 533 ð t .
SFX 533 0 a .
SFX 533 0 an .
SFX 533 0 ar .
SFX 533 0 ari .
SFX 533 0 ir .
SFX 533 0 ur .

#barnsverkir
SFX 534 N 7
SFX 534 j ir .
SFX 534 j irnar .
SFX 534 j irnir .
SFX 534 0 a .
SFX 534 0 anna .
SFX 534 0 um .
SFX 534 0 unum .

#avskapa
SFX 535 N 9
SFX 535 t a .
SFX 535 t að .
SFX 535 t aði .
SFX 535 t aðu .
SFX 535 t ar .
SFX 535 t t .
SFX 535 t ti .
SFX 535 t tu .
SFX 535 0 ur .

#aldudrabb
SFX 536 N 5
SFX 536 b s .
SFX 536 b sins .
SFX 536 0 i .
SFX 536 0 ið .
SFX 536 0 inum .

#bekvemmur
SFX 537 N 8
SFX 537 m t .
SFX 537 0 a .
SFX 537 0 an .
SFX 537 0 ar .
SFX 537 0 ari .
SFX 537 0 ir .
SFX 537 0 um .
SFX 537 0 ur .

#avdottin
SFX 538 N 8
SFX 538 t na .
SFX 538 t nan .
SFX 538 t nar .
SFX 538 t nari .
SFX 538 t nir .
SFX 538 t num .
SFX 538 0 ið .
SFX 538 0 in .

#bátalodd
SFX 539 N 10
SFX 539 d s .
SFX 539 d sins .
SFX 539 0 a .
SFX 539 0 anna .
SFX 539 0 i .
SFX 539 0 ið .
SFX 539 0 ini .
SFX 539 0 inum .
SFX 539 0 um .
SFX 539 0 unum .

#Aldafaðir
SFX 540 N 5
SFX 540 0 in .
SFX 540 0 inum .
SFX 540 0 num .
SFX 540 0 s .
SFX 540 0 sins .

#Dalur
SFX 541 N 3
SFX 541 0 i .
SFX 541 0 s .
SFX 541 0 ur .

#barnasong
SFX 542 N 8
SFX 542 j ir .
SFX 542 j irnar .
SFX 542 0 a .
SFX 542 0 anna .
SFX 542 0 ar .
SFX 542 0 arinnar .
SFX 542 0 um .
SFX 542 0 unum .

#Árnafjørður
SFX 543 N 1
SFX 543 0 i .

#bitmuður
SFX 544 N 12
SFX 544 n s .
SFX 544 n sins .
SFX 544 0 a .
SFX 544 0 anna .
SFX 544 0 ar .
SFX 544 0 arnar .
SFX 544 0 arnir .
SFX 544 0 i .
SFX 544 0 in .
SFX 544 0 inum .
SFX 544 0 um .
SFX 544 0 unum .

#alhanda
SFX 545 N 4
SFX 545 0 a .
SFX 545 0 að .
SFX 545 0 ans .
SFX 545 0 anum .

#afturtrá
SFX 546 N 5
SFX 546 0 ar .
SFX 546 0 arinnar .
SFX 546 0 in .
SFX 546 0 nna .
SFX 546 0 nni .

#flotvág
SFX 547 N 11
SFX 547 0 a .
SFX 547 0 anna .
SFX 547 0 ar .
SFX 547 0 arinnar .
SFX 547 0 in .
SFX 547 0 ir .
SFX 547 0 irnar .
SFX 547 0 na .
SFX 547 0 ni .
SFX 547 0 um .
SFX 547 0 unum .

#beinverkur
SFX 548 N 15
SFX 548 j 0 .
SFX 548 j i .
SFX 548 j in .
SFX 548 j inum .
SFX 548 j ir .
SFX 548 j irnar .
SFX 548 j irnir .
SFX 548 j s .
SFX 548 j sins .
SFX 548 j ur .
SFX 548 j urin .
SFX 548 0 a .
SFX 548 0 anna .
SFX 548 0 um .
SFX 548 0 unum .

#avklæðast
SFX 549 N 2
SFX 549 0 ist .
SFX 549 0 ust .

#bakkarakstur
SFX 550 N 23
SFX 550 r ra .
SFX 550 r ranna .
SFX 550 r rar .
SFX 550 r rarins .
SFX 550 r ri .
SFX 550 r rinum .
SFX 550 r rir .
SFX 550 r rirnar .
SFX 550 r rirnir .
SFX 550 r rum .
SFX 550 r runum .
SFX 550 r ur .
SFX 550 r urin .
SFX 550 0 a .
SFX 550 0 anna .
SFX 550 0 ar .
SFX 550 0 arins .
SFX 550 0 arnar .
SFX 550 0 arnir .
SFX 550 0 i .
SFX 550 0 inum .
SFX 550 0 um .
SFX 550 0 unum .

#áarhylur
SFX 551 N 16
SFX 551 j 0 .
SFX 551 j i .
SFX 551 j in .
SFX 551 j inum .
SFX 551 j s .
SFX 551 j sins .
SFX 551 j ur .
SFX 551 j urin .
SFX 551 0 a .
SFX 551 0 anna .
SFX 551 0 ar .
SFX 551 0 arins .
SFX 551 0 arnar .
SFX 551 0 arnir .
SFX 551 0 um .
SFX 551 0 unum .

#Akrar
SFX 552 N 2
SFX 552 0 a .
SFX 552 0 ar .

#forligheit
SFX 553 N 12
SFX 553 0 heit .
SFX 553 0 heita .
SFX 553 0 heitanna .
SFX 553 0 heitar .
SFX 553 0 heitarinnar .
SFX 553 0 heitin .
SFX 553 0 heitina .
SFX 553 0 heitini .
SFX 553 0 heitir .
SFX 553 0 heitirnar .
SFX 553 0 heitum .
SFX 553 0 heitunum .

#borða
SFX 554 N 3
SFX 554 0 að .
SFX 554 0 aði .
SFX 554 0 aðu .

#bestastova
SFX 555 N 2
SFX 555 0 a .
SFX 555 0 an .

#bestastova
SFX 556 N 10
SFX 556 0 a .
SFX 556 0 anna .
SFX 556 0 u .
SFX 556 0 um .
SFX 556 0 una .
SFX 556 0 uni .
SFX 556 0 unnar .
SFX 556 0 unum .
SFX 556 0 ur .
SFX 556 0 urnar .

#fretstingir
SFX 557 N 7
SFX 557 0 a .
SFX 557 0 anna .
SFX 557 0 ir .
SFX 557 0 irnar .
SFX 557 0 irnir .
SFX 557 0 um .
SFX 557 0 unum .

#bomm
SFX 558 N 10
SFX 558 m s .
SFX 558 m sins .
SFX 558 0 a .
SFX 558 0 anna .
SFX 558 0 i .
SFX 558 0 ið .
SFX 558 0 ini .
SFX 558 0 inum .
SFX 558 0 um .
SFX 558 0 unum .

#forfarast
SFX 559 N 2
SFX 559 0 ast .
SFX 559 0 ist .

#avfallin
SFX 560 N 8
SFX 560 l na .
SFX 560 l nan .
SFX 560 l nar .
SFX 560 l nari .
SFX 560 l nir .
SFX 560 l num .
SFX 560 0 ið .
SFX 560 0 in .
