utilities/dictionaries/fo_FO-Faroese.dic
Aldafaðir/540
alfaðir/540,540
álitisvirð/1,526
álvar/1,545,50,12,116,187,193
áragam/1,517
áragom/1,521
ástartrá/546
avgam/1,517
avgom/1,521
bakkaskrubb/536
barnalyndisgleð/1,526
bátahylj/1,551
bergfall/1,560
bilt/1,535
blóðskamm/1,509
blýlodd/539
bráðvak/1,508
bráðvøk/1,514
brett/1,130,15,538,11
bringsvarð/1,512
bróstverkj/1,548
brúdleypsdrekk/1,545
brúðseingj/1,542
brumm/558,3,6
burturfall/1,560
byrd/1,554
byrð/1,3,552,441
dánarfæ/531
dánarfíggj/1,530
dap/1,6,508
desigramm/558
deyðarædd/9,549
ditt/1,130,538
døp/1,514
dótturbónd/1,516
dótturbønd/1,515
drabb/536,22
droypioff/1,520
drukk/1,94,524
dumm/537
eingj/1,542
eirishvann/1,509
ekkólodd/539
eldfjall/513
eldoff/1,520
elgd/1,527
ennispøn/1,518
ergam/1,517
ergom/1,521
etikk/519
eystursjóvarbý/507
farbann/525
fer/1,291,510,223
firð/1,511
fjørð/522
fleskasvarð/1,512
flógvakríggj/528
forherd/1,554
forherð/1,552,290,11,37
fosturfaðir/540
føt/18,515,80,32
fríbónd/1,516
frítíðarbý/507
Funningsfirð/1,543
fyljaleggj/1,534
fyribyrgd/1,527
fyrifar/1,559
gallharð/1,533
garnaskramb/1,505
góðastov/1,555
góðustov/1,556
gosfjall/513
got/10,397,144,4,82,523,229,53
grafikk/519
granitt/506
grassvarð/1,512
grátihylj/1,551
grimm/537
grindarakstr/1,550
grunn/544,124,92,327,115,424
gruns/1,510,136
há/1,77,174,205,92,50,58,433,172,523,12,195,49,280,368,150,313,132,104
hálsverkj/1,548
hálvrópt/1,535
handilsbann/525
havnarbý/507
heilabark/1,512
heimskríggj/528
heimtrá/546
heitoff/1,520
Hest/541
hestfirð/1,511
hestfjørð/522
híð/42,559
hídd/1,549
hjartatátt/532
høgguspøn/1,518
høvlispøn/1,518
hvalrakstr/1,550
hvalvág/547,7
hvinus/529
hvøkk/68,524,608,519
illasjúk/1,555
illusjúk/1,556
íløgufæ/531
íløgufíggj/1,530
innbý/507
innfall/1,560
jabb/536,6
jarnharð/1,533
javndimm/537
Jorsal/1,557
kaffimunn/544,115
kall/99,513,6,430,306,128,92,710,112,217,20,366
kálseingj/1,542
kappstrídd/1,549
kavafann/1,509
kerv/1,6,15,510
kilogramm/558
kitt/506,6,862
klár/35,3,6,553,4,11,58,280,263,7,14
knæbønd/1,515
Kollafirð/1,543
kongsbónd/1,516
krokus/529
krúnuspón/532
kvett/315,130,538,23,295,22,20
lagvak/1,508
lagvøk/1,514
lambsverkj/1,548
Langasand/541
lík/10,6,6,93,437,454,123,553,50,4,127,11,641,641,117,12,20,60,379,173,85,251,14
litbrá/546
lívsæv/1,526
ljómvak/1,508
ljómvøk/1,514
lodd/539,6,44,62,11,327,199
lodnaskør/1,555
lógbann/525,6
longuføst/1,556
lortalág/547
magasnert/1,557
mirak/1,505
móðurfaðir/540
mord/1,554
munnsmakk/519
Nólsoyarfirð/1,511
Nólsoyarfjørð/522
norður/1,252,123,206,58,523,230,101,222
nummarkall/513
nýfikk/1,524
óðalsbønd/1,515
omanrakstr/1,550
orð/10,552,254,405,105,378,11,261,36,269,79,49,114,223,222,165,97,229
óskett/1,538
Oyndarfirð/1,543
paprik/1,545
peningagramm/537
pisuhylj/1,551
prentis/529
prískríggj/528
rakbónd/1,516
rámt/1,535
ránsfæ/531
ránsfíggj/1,530
reið/3,76,76,559,341,64,25,23,31,192,20,240,53,71,71
rekaspritt/506
roykoff/1,520
saguspøn/1,557
sálig/1,553
sam/1,517,25,117,84
samansvoll/1,560
samrádd/9,549
samsyrgd/1,527
Sand/541
sandgrunn/544
seingj/1,542
siffanastreingj/1,534
sildaskrubb/536
sinfansstreingj/1,534
sjóverkj/1,548
Skálafjarð/1,512
skálkalág/547
skapt/535,9
skarafann/1,509
Skipanes/543
skólpalodd/539
skramb/1,505
skríggj/528,6
skúlagom/1,521
sláturoff/1,520
smábønd/1,515
smakk/6,133,141,36,79,695,519
smámun/1,557
snakk/478,524
snev/1,510
snjallabjall/1,555
snjøllubjall/1,556
sod/1,19,545,65
soðspøn/1,518
Søldarfirð/1,511
Søldarfjørð/522
sópispón/532
spann/8,6,509
spyrjus/529
starvsbann/525
stemp/1,505
stórbónd/1,516
stórbý/507
stormharð/1,533
stóruryggj/1,534
styrk/526,11,58,28
suður/1,123,206,58,523,333,157,101
sundhylj/1,551
svikavág/547
svínafeitt/506
Syðradal/541
syn/1,511
tannfæ/531
tannfíggj/1,530
teknikk/519
telegramm/558
telgispøn/1,518
tokufjall/513
torragrunn/544
træspón/532
Trongisvágsfjørð/522
tvæveturgam/1,517
tvæveturgom/1,521
tvings/1,510
tykk/1,524
tyngd/17,527
umord/1,554
undurvak/1,508
undurvøk/1,514
ússalig/1,553
vanrakstr/1,550
varð/1,552,752,51,169,286,4,192,20,95,142,67
veiðibann/525
viðfar/1,559,16
vindharð/1,533
ving/1,602,505
vínspritt/506
virkistrá/546
